Utah statutes.
61-2b-31.   Disciplinary hearing process.
(1)  Before disciplinary action may be taken by the board, the division shall:
(a)  notify the person against whom the board seeks to take disciplinary
action; and
(b)  commence an adjudicative proceeding.
(2)  If, after the hearing, the board determines that a person described in
Subsection (1) violated this chapter, the board may impose disciplinary action
by written order as provided in Section 61-2b-29.
(3) (a)  The board may:
(i)  conduct hearings with the assistance of an administrative law judge; or
(ii)  delegate hearings to an administrative law judge.
(b)  If a hearing is delegated by the board to an administrative law judge,
the administrative law judge shall submit to the board for its consideration:
(i)  written findings of fact;
(ii)  written conclusions of law; and
(iii)  a recommended order.
(4) (a) An applicant, licensee, certificate holder, registrant, or person
aggrieved, including the complainant, may obtain judicial review of an adverse
ruling, order, or decision of the board.
(b)  If an applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant prevails in
an appeal and the court finds that the state action is undertaken without
substantial justification, the court may award reasonable litigation expenses
to the applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant as provided
under Title 78B, Chapter 8, Part 5, Small Business Equal Access to Justice
Act.
